Massachusetts, session 194th, H5529.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by chapter 178 of
the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by inserting the following new paragraph:
“The registrar shall furnish without charge to owners of private passenger motor vehicles
who are veterans as defined in said clause forty-third of said section seven of said chapter four
who have been awarded the Legion of Merit and upon evidence deemed satisfactory by the
registrar, distinctive registration plates bearing the words “LEGION OF MERIT RECIPIENT”
for one private passenger motor vehicle owned and principally used by such Legion of Merit
recipient or a distinctive emblem to be affixed to a “VETERAN” registration plate for a
motorcycle owned and principally used by such recipient; provided however, that the surviving
spouse of a deceased recipient of the Legion of Merit may elect to retain such distinctive
registration plates or emblem for personal use upon payment of the established registration fee
for private passenger motor vehicles or motorcycles and an additional annual twenty dollar fee
until such time as such spouse remarries or fails to renew or cancels such registration.”
of 1